test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-utr_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # dejj C-stem
    dejj+N+Utr+Sg+Indef: dejj
    dejj+N+Utr+Sg+Def: dejjen
    dejj+N+Utr+Pl+Indef: dejjer
    dejj+N+Utr+Pl+Def: dejjena

  Noun - : # balo V-stem ... correct???
    balo+N+Utr+Sg+Indef: balo
    balo+N+Utr+Sg+Def: baloen
    balo+N+Utr+Pl+Indef: baloar
    balo+N+Utr+Pl+Def: baloena
